Tennessee, session 114, SB2610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-2903, is amended by adding
the following as a new, appropriately designated subdivision:
( ) "Municipality" means an incorporated city or a town that does not have a
school system or LEA within its jurisdiction;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 67, Chapter 4, Part 29, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, a municipality, by ordinance adopted by
its governing body in the manner provided in § 67-4-2904(b), may levy a tax on the
privilege of engaging in the act of development within the boundaries of the municipality.
Any such tax must be levied at the rate and under the terms, conditions, and limitations
contained in §§ 67-4-2908 and 67-4-2909. The taxes collected pursuant to this section
must be remitted to the municipal official designated in the ordinance to collect such
taxes. The taxes must be placed in a fund designated by the governing body and the
proceeds must be used exclusively for the purpose funding a capital improvement
program for the construction and improvement of roads, streets, sidewalks, trails, and
other similar transportation infrastructure within the municipality. The municipality may
adopt administrative guidelines, procedures, regulations, and forms necessary to
properly implement, administer, and enforce this section.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2610
012710
- 1 -